Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-128
Douglas.

The county of Douglas is bounded as follows: Commencing at a point on the eastern boundary line of the State of Nebraska as established by the Iowa-Nebraska Boundary Compact of 1943, two miles south of the dividing line between townships fourteen and fifteen, north; thence north and following said eastern boundary line to the north boundary line of township sixteen; thence west to a point in the middle of the main channel of the Platte River; thence down said channel to a point two miles due south of the dividing line between townships fourteen and fifteen; and thence east to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 18, p. 215;

R.S.1913, § 841;

C.S.1922, § 743;

C.S.1929, § 25-130;

R.S.1943, § 22-128;

Laws 1955, c. 65, § 4, p. 213.